Utah statutes.
72-9-706.   Motor carrier fee for certain vehicles -- Collection.

(1)  A motor carrier, not subject to the fee under Section 41-1a-1219, who operates a commercial vehicle on a highway within this state shall pay an annual motor carrier fee at the same rate provided under Section 41-1a-1219 for each motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles operated in this state.

(2)  The department shall collect the fee required under this section.

